Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 4. Sabbatical Leave.

Collateral references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools, § 177.

78 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts, § 329.

Sec. 14.20.280.
Basis of leave.

A teacher who has rendered active service for seven or more years in a district is eligible for sabbatical leave. Sabbatical leave may be taken for educational purposes only, and for not more than one school year.

History.

(§ 1 ch 134 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 1964; am § 2 ch 104 SLA 1965; am § 27 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 168 SLA 1968)

Sec. 14.20.290.
Application.

A teacher who wishes to take sabbatical leave shall apply to the governing body of the school district. The teacher shall submit information showing qualifications for sabbatical leave and a plan for education during the leave.

History.

(§ 2 ch 134 SLA 1962; am § 28 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Sec. 14.20.300.
Selection of teachers.

The governing body of the school district has the responsibility for selection of the teachers to be granted sabbatical leave.

In selecting teachers for sabbatical leave, the governing body shall consider the benefit that the school district will derive from the proposed plan of the teacher for educational purposes, the field of study of the teacher, the contributions of the teacher to education in the state, and the seniority of the teacher.

History.

(§ 3 ch 134 SLA 1962; am § 29 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Sec. 14.20.310.
Number of teachers on sabbatical leave; compensation.

The number of teachers eligible for sabbatical leave that may be allowed under AS

14.20.280

—

14.20.350

is as follows:

not more than one-half of one percent of the total number of teachers from all borough and city school districts and regional educational attendance areas may be on state-supported sabbatical leave in any year;

any number of teachers may be on sabbatical leave at school district or personal expense.

A teacher on state-supported sabbatical leave is entitled to one-half of base salary to be paid by the department.

A teacher on sabbatical leave at district expense is entitled to an amount of salary to be determined by the school board.

History.

(§ 4 ch 134 SLA 1962; am § 3 ch 104 SLA 1965; am § 30 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 168 SLA 1968; am § 53 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 7 ch 9 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective May 10, 2013, in (a)(1), substituted “regional educational attendance areas” for “regional education attendance areas”.

Sec. 14.20.320.
Responsibility of teacher.

Upon the return of a teacher to the teaching position, the teacher shall make a report to the governing body concerning educational accomplishments.
A teacher who does not serve for at least a full year after returning shall refund to the school board money paid to the teacher under AS

14.20.310

unless the failure to serve a full year after return is attributable to sickness, injury, or death.

History.

(§ 5 ch 134 SLA 1962; am § 4 ch 104 SLA 1965; am § 31 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 20 ch 46 SLA 1970; am § 54 ch 6 SLA 1984)

Sec. 14.20.330.
Position, tenure, and retirement.

Unless it is otherwise agreed, a teacher returning from sabbatical leave shall return to the position occupied by that teacher when the sabbatical leave began.

A sabbatical leave is not an interruption of the continuous service necessary to attain or retain tenure under AS

14.20.150

,

14.20.155

, or

14.20.160

. However, the time spent on sabbatical leave may not be counted in determining when a teacher has sufficient service to enable the teacher to acquire tenure rights.

A sabbatical leave is not a break in service for retirement purposes. Payment into the retirement fund shall be made on the basis of full salary.

History.

(§ 6 ch 134 SLA 1962; am § 32 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Sec. 14.20.340.
Military service and previous leaves of absence.

To determine eligibility for sabbatical leave, tours of military service and leaves of absence granted before July 1, 1963, are not considered years of active service.

History.

(§ 7 ch 134 SLA 1962; am § 2 ch 62 SLA 1964)

Sec. 14.20.345.
Leave of absence without pay.

A teacher may be granted a leave of absence without pay for the purposes which may be approved by the governing body of the district if

the teacher’s application is approved by the governing body of the district; and

the teacher agrees to return to employment in a public school not later than the beginning of the school year following termination of the period for which the leave of absence was granted.

A leave of absence is not an interruption of the continuous service necessary to attain or retain retirement or tenure rights under AS

14.20.150

,

14.20.155

, or

14.20.160

. However, the time spent on leave of absence may not be counted in determining when a teacher has sufficient service to enable the teacher to acquire retirement or tenure rights.

The leave of absence is not a break in service for retirement purposes.

The governing body of the district may agree to continue the teacher’s retirement contributions if the teacher agrees to pay the percent required under AS

14.25.050

of the salary the teacher would have received during the leave of absence and reimburse the district for the district’s required retirement contribution. Each year of leave of absence then would count as a year of retirement service.

The governing body of the district may advance the teacher on the district salary schedule when the teacher returns to employment if the governing body determines that the teacher’s leave of absence was educationally or professionally beneficial to the teacher or the district.

A teacher may make contributions to the retirement fund for each year or portion of a year of leave of absence taken. The contribution shall include the required percent of the salary the teacher would have received had the leave of absence not been taken, plus the required employer and state contributions that would have been made. Compound interest at the rate prescribed by regulation shall be added as computed from the beginning date of the leave of absence to the date the teacher pays the contribution.

History.

(§ 5 ch 104 SLA 1965; am §§ 33, 34 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 44 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 184 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 99 SLA 1974; am § 1 ch 6 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For service under the defined benefits plan (AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

), see 2 AAC 36, art. 4.

Sec. 14.20.350.
Definition.

In AS

14.20.280

—

14.20.350

, “teacher” means a certificated member of the teaching, supervisory, or administrative corps in the public schools of the state.

History.

(§ 8 ch 134 SLA 1962)